src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-alus_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - alus: # Noun 'tree / alukse' - full paradigm
     alus+N+Sg+Nom: alus
     alus+N+Sg+Gen: aluksen
     alus+N+Sg+Acc: [alus, aluksen]
     alus+N+Sg+Par: alustu
     alus+N+Sg+Tra: aluksekse
     alus+N+Sg+Abe: [alukseta, aluksettah]
     alus+N+Sg+Com: aluksenke
     alus+N+Sg+Ine: alukses
     alus+N+Sg+Ela: [aluksespäi, alukses]
     alus+N+Sg+Ill: alukseh
     alus+N+Sg+Ade: aluksel
     alus+N+Sg+Abl: [alukselpäi, aluksel]
     alus+N+Sg+All: aluksele
     alus+N+Sg+Ess: aluksennu
     alus+N+Sg+Ter: aluksessah
     alus+N+Sg+Apr: alukselluo
     alus+N+Pl+Nom: alukset
     alus+N+Pl+Gen: aluksien
     alus+N+Pl+Acc: alukset
     alus+N+Pl+Par: aluksii
     alus+N+Pl+Tra: aluksikse
     alus+N+Pl+Abe: [aluksita, aluksittah]
     alus+N+Pl+Com: aluksienke
     alus+N+Pl+Ine: aluksis
     alus+N+Pl+Ela: [aluksispäi, aluksis]
     alus+N+Pl+Ill: aluksih
     alus+N+Pl+Ade: aluksil
     alus+N+Pl+Abl: [aluksilpäi, aluksil]
     alus+N+Pl+All: aluksile
     alus+N+Pl+Ess: aluksinnu
     alus+N+Pl+Ins: aluksin
     alus+N+Pl+Apr: aluksielluo
     alus+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: alusgi
     alus+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: aluksengi
     alus+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [alusgi, aluksengi]
     alus+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: alustugi
     alus+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: alukseksegi
     alus+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [aluksetagi, aluksettahgi]
     alus+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: aluksenkegi
     alus+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: aluksesgi
     alus+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [aluksespäigi, aluksesgi]
     alus+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: aluksehgi
     alus+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: alukselgi
     alus+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [alukselpäigi, alukselgi]
     alus+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: alukselegi
     alus+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: aluksennugi
     alus+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: aluksessahgi
     alus+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: alukselluogi
     alus+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: aluksetgi
     alus+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: aluksiengi
     alus+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: aluksetgi
     alus+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: aluksiigi
     alus+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: aluksiksegi
     alus+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [aluksitagi, aluksittahgi]
     alus+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: aluksienkegi
     alus+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: aluksisgi
     alus+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [aluksispäigi, aluksisgi]
     alus+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: aluksihgi
     alus+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: aluksilgi
     alus+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [aluksilpäigi, aluksilgi]
     alus+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: aluksilegi
     alus+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: aluksinnugi
     alus+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: aluksingi
     alus+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: aluksielluogi
